California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
 of bonds, which rate shall not exceed the rate permitted for bonds by Section 53531 of the Government Code, and shall begin to run on the 31st day after the confirmation of the report. Thereafter the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) shall be applicable and payments on assessments at bond shall be made as therein provided. The bonds may be issued and sold as the legislative body directs and may be dated at any time after the expiration of the cash payment period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 507, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

5630.

Whenever the property fronting on a sidewalk required to be maintained and repaired pursuant to the provisions of this chapter lies within one city or unincorporated territory of a county, and the sidewalk required to be so maintained and repaired lies within another city or unincorporated territory of a county, the superintendent of streets of the city or county having jurisdiction over the sidewalk shall have full authority to serve notices to repair and do all work contemplated by Articles 2 and 3 of this chapter, notwithstanding the fact that the property fronting on the sidewalk lies within another city or unincorporated territory of a county. The legislative body of the
 city or county within which the sidewalk has been repaired pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall have jurisdiction to levy an assessment to pay the cost of any such sidewalk repairs against the parcel of property fronting on said sidewalk, notwithstanding the fact that said property lies within another city or unincorporated territory of a county and said assessment shall be a lien on said property for the amount thereof until the assessment and all interest thereon is paid or until it is discharged of record.

The provisions of Sections 5628 and 5629 of this code shall be applicable to the collection and enforcement of all liens levied pursuant to the provisions of this section and the amount so collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city or county as the case may be which conducted the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 541.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 24. Limitation of Actions [5660. - 5661.]

5660.

No action, suit, or proceeding to set aside, cancel, avoid, annul or correct any assessment or reassessment, or to review any of the proceedings, acts, or determinations therein, or to question the validity of, or to enjoin the collection of the assessments or reassessments, or to enjoin the issuance of bonds to represent the same, shall be maintained by any person unless such action is commenced within 30 days after the recording of the warrant, diagram and assessment or reassessment, and thereafter all persons shall be barred from any such action or any defense of invalidity of the assessment or of bonds issued thereon or of the reassessment if such is made and of bonds issued thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5661.

No proceedings taken or had under this division shall ever be held to be invalid on the ground that the street, right-of-way, public property or any portion thereof, upon which the work or any part thereof is or was done has not been lawfully dedicated or acquired; provided, the same is lawfully dedicated or acquired, or an order for possession prior to judgment has been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 25. Duties of Officers [5680. - 5721.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Superintendent of Streets [5680. - 5686.]

5680.

The superintendent of streets shall keep a public office in some convenient place within the city, and shall keep such records as may be required by this division. The records so kept and signed by him shall have the same force and effect as other public records, and copies therefrom duly certified, may be used in evidence with the same effect as the originals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

5681.

The superintendent of streets shall see that the laws, ordinances, orders, and regulations relating to the public streets are fully carried into execution, and that the penalties thereof are rigidly enforced. He shall keep himself informed of the condition of all the public streets and also of all public buildings, parks, lots, and grounds of the city, as may be prescribed by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5682.

The superintendent of streets shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, give bonds to the city, with such sureties and for such sums as may be required by the legislative body. If he fails to see that the laws, ordinances, orders, and regulations relating to the public streets are carried into execution, after notice from any citizen of a violation thereof, he and his sureties shall be liable upon his official bond to any person injured in his person or property in consequence of said official neglect.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5683.

The superintendent of streets shall superintend and direct the cleaning of all sewers, and the expense of the same shall be paid out of the street or sewer fund of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5684.

If the superintendent of streets is required to give notice in writing to any person under this division, he may personally serve such notice, and certify to the fact of such service, or any person, with the permission of the superintendent of streets, may serve such notice and such person shall file an affidavit of service with the superintendent of streets.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5685.

The superintendent of streets shall keep a record of the service of all notices which are served by him or with his permission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5686.

For all purposes and in all cases where a verification is required under this division, such verification may be made before the superintendent of streets who is hereby authorized to administer oaths for that purpose, or before any other person authorized to administer oaths.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The Engineer [5700. - 5703.]

5700.

The engineer or where there is no engineer, an engineer of work shall be the proper officer to do the surveying and other engineering work necessary to be done under this division, and to survey and measure the work to be done under contracts for grading, macadamizing, or improving streets and other work done under this division, and to estimate the costs and expenses thereof, and perform such other duties under this division as may be directed by the legislative body. Every certificate signed by him in his official capacity shall be prima facie evidence in all courts in this State of the truth of the contents. He shall also keep a record of all surveys made under the provisions of this division, as in other cases.

In a county having a population of 4,000,000 or over, a registered civil engineer, registered pursuant to Chapter 7, Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, shall be the proper person to do any work required to prepare plans pursuant to Section 5130.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1834.)
-------------------------------------------

5701.

In its discretion, the legislative body may employ an engineer of work, other than the engineer or in place of the engineer, and all provisions of this division applicable to the engineer shall apply to such engineer of work. The legislative body shall initially fix or thereafter confirm the compensation of the engineer or engineer of work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

5702.

The engineer of work may be an individual, joint venture, copartnership or corporation. If the engineer of work employed be an individual, he shall make and sign any certificate or document required to be made or signed by the engineer of work. If the engineer of work employed be a joint venture, copartnership or corporation, the legislative body, either by contract of employment or by resolution, shall designate a member of the joint venture, a partner, an officer of the corporation, or an authorized agent of any of the foregoing to make and sign any certificate or document required to be made or signed by the engineer of work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

5703.

All certificates or documents required to be signed by or kept on file by the engineer of work shall be kept on file with the superintendent of streets. If a city does not have a superintendent of streets, said certificates or documents shall be kept on file with the clerk or such other officer of the city as may be designated for that purpose by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Superintendent of Construction [5710. - 5710.]

5710.

The superintendent of streets, or the engineer, if the legislative body has by resolution directed that the work be done under his direction and to his satisfaction, shall, when in his judgment it is necessary, appoint a suitable person to take charge of and superintend the construction and improvement of any work authorized by this division, whose duty it shall be to see that the contract made for the doing of the work is strictly fulfilled in every respect and in case of any departure therefrom to report the same to the officer who appointed him. Such person shall be allowed for his time actually employed in the discharge of his duties such compensation as shall be just and the rate thereof shall be fixed by the legislative body conducting the proceedings. The sum to which the party so employed shall be entitled shall be deemed to be incidental expenses within the meaning of those words as used in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Provisions Applicable to Counties Only [5720. - 5721.]

5720.

If a county is conducting the proceedings the legislative body may designate the county road commissioner or any other competent county officer, other than the county surveyor, to serve without additional compensation from the county, as the officer to perform any or all of the duties conferred upon the street superintendent or the engineer in this division. The duties thus transferred shall be the duties of the officer so designated, and all of the provisions of this division relating to such duties and to the incidental expenses thereof shall apply to such officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1324.)
-------------------------------------------

5721.

If the legislative body of a county appoints an engineer of work in accordance with Article 2 of this chapter, it may provide that the work shall be done under his direction and to his satisfaction and that the materials used shall comply with the specifications and be to the satisfaction of such engineer of work and it may provide that the engineer of work shall make and sign the assessment. The contract shall nevertheless be entered into with the county surveyor, and the assessment and warrant when confirmed shall be recorded in the office of the county surveyor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 26. Maintenance Districts [5820. - 5856.]

5820.

As used in this article, “maintenance district” means an assessment district which a county board of supervisors or the legislative body of a city has created pursuant to this chapter.

This chapter, except Sections 5850 to 5853, inclusive, applies to the creation of maintenance districts by, and maintenance districts created by, the legislative body of a city. For such purpose, the references in this chapter to a county or a county officer shall be deemed to refer, respectively, to a city or a city officer performing the same duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.

The board of supervisors may, in its resolution declaring its intention to order work done or improvements made or by separate resolution, declare its intention to order that the expenses of maintaining and operating any or all of said improvements or any or all other improvements such as are permitted to be constructed herein, including the cost of necessary repairs, replacements, fuel, power, electrical current, care, supervision, and any and all other items necessary for the proper maintenance and operation thereof, shall be assessed, either partly or wholly, upon the real property or upon the land only lying within the district to be benefited by and to be assessed to pay the cost of the construction of said improvement, or upon such district as the board of supervisors shall determine will be benefited by the maintenance and operation of the improvements proposed to be maintained; the amounts so assessed to be levied and collected in the same manner and by the same officers as taxes for county purposes are levied and collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.1.

The board of supervisors may, in its resolution declaring its intention to order work done or improvements made, declare its intention to order the territory within which the work is to be done or improvements constructed annexed to an existing maintenance district formed under the provisions of this chapter or under the provisions of Chapter 4, Part 3, Division 5, of the Health and Safety Code.

The resolution of intention may describe the territory to be annexed as having the same boundaries as those of the district to be assessed for the cost of constructing the improvements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.2.

If the board of supervisors in its resolution of intention declares its intention to order the territory within which the improvements are to be constructed annexed to an existing maintenance district, the notice of improvement shall likewise give notice of such declaration of intention and that protests against such annexation may be filed and will be heard in accordance with the provisions of this chapter at the time and place provided for the hearing on the resolution of intention to perform the work.

The board of supervisors shall acquire jurisdiction to order the annexation of such territory to an existing maintenance district by giving notice within the territory proposed to be annexed in the same manner prescribed in this division for the acquiring of jurisdiction to order the construction of improvements, and within the district to which such territory is proposed to be annexed by giving notice as is provided to be given in such district by Section 5838.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

5821.3.

In the event that an ordinance requires the installation of a sewer, drainage, or street lighting system by a subdivider, the resolution of intention may state that the territory owned by the subdivider comes under the terms of such ordinance and order that such territory be formed into a maintenance district, or annexed to an existing maintenance district, without notice and hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 348.)
-------------------------------------------

5822.

The resolution of intention shall describe the boundaries of the district which is to be assessed for such maintenance and operation, or if the improvements or any part thereof to be maintained or operated are constructed in the same proceeding, it may describe the maintenance district as having the same boundaries as those of the district to be assessed for the cost of constructing the improvement. In either case the maintenance district may be designated by a name by which it may thereafter be referred to in all subsequent proceedings, including proceedings for the levy and collection of taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5823.

The maintenance district may include property lying within one or more cities if the consent of the legislative body of each such city to the formation of such district expressed by resolution, is first obtained before the resolution of intention is adopted by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5824.

At any time not later than the hour for hearing objections to the proposed work as provided in this division, or at any time not later than the time fixed in the resolution of intention for the hearing of objections, if the resolution of intention provides for maintenance only, any person permitted by the provisions of this division to make written protest against the proposed work or against the extent of the district to be assessed therefor, or both, may make like protest and in like manner against the ordering of the formation of the maintenance district or against the extent of the maintenance district, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5824.1.

If the resolution of intention contemplates annexation of the territory within which the improvements are to be constructed to an existing maintenance district, written protests against such annexation or the extent thereof may be filed by any interested person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

5825.

The board of supervisors, in addition to hearing protests against the proposed work and the extent of the district to be assessed therefor, shall hear and pass upon all protests against the formation of the maintenance district and against the extent thereof, and shall hear and pass upon all protests against the annexation of the territory within which the improvements are to be constructed to an existing maintenance district, and its decision shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 829.)
-------------------------------------------

5826.

If the board of supervisors finds that the protest against the formation of the maintenance district is made by the owners of more than one-half of the area of the property included within such district, no further proceedings shall be taken, unless the protests are overruled by an affirmative vote of four-fifths of the members of the board of supervisors, for a period of six months from the date of the decision of the board of supervisors on the hearing. The board of supervisors may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5827.

If the board of supervisors, in its resolution of intention, declares its intention to order a maintenance district formed, the notice of improvement shall likewise give notice of such declaration of intention and that protests against such maintenance district may be filed and will be heard in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5828.

The board of supervisors shall acquire jurisdiction to order that the maintenance district be formed in the same manner prescribed in this division for the acquiring of jurisdiction to order the construction of improvements, and it may thereupon by resolution order the formation of such a maintenance district, which order may be contained in the resolution ordering the construction of the work in those cases where such work is provided to be done in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5828.1.

When the board of supervisors adopts a separate resolution declaring its intention to form a maintenance district for sanitary sewers or for street lighting, the clerk shall be directed to give notice of the hearing. The notice shall have the heading “Notice of the proposed formation of ____ Sewer (or Street Lighting) Maintenance District,” stating the name of the proposed district. It shall:

(a) State the time and place for the hearing.

(b) Set forth the exterior boundaries of the territory proposed to be organized into a district.

In lieu of a description, the boundaries of the territory proposed to be included may be shown by means of a diagram printed upon the notice. The board shall direct the clerk to publish the notice and shall also direct the clerk to post the notice in three public places in the proposed district at least 10 days prior to the date set for the hearing. The heading of each posted notice shall be in letters not less than one inch in height. Notice by mail is not required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 594.)
-------------------------------------------

5829.

Upon adoption of the resolution ordering the formation of the maintenance district or the annexation of territory to an existing maintenance district, the legislative body adopting the resolution shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Thereafter, the property included within such district shall be segregated on the assessment roll under the designation contained in the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

5829.1.

Any district may contract with the Federal Government of the United States or any branch thereof, or any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation, or with any person, firm or corporation, for the joint use of any sewer or sewers or other works or facilities for handling, treatment and disposal of sewage or industrial waste from the district and such other area as may be designated in said contract, when in the judgment of the legislative body of said district it is for the best interest of the district so to do. Any such contract may provide for the maintenance and operation of such sewer or sewers, or other works or facilities, and for the payment by or for the parties thereto of such proportionate part of the cost of the maintenance and operation of such sewer or sewers or other works or facilities as may be stated in said contract, the payment to be made at such time and in such amount as may be provided by said contract. Any such contract may provide for the joint use of any sewer or sewers, or works or facilities for the handling, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, and for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste from such area for each of the parties thereto as may be described in said contract.

Any district which has acquired or constructed or which proposes to acquire or construct, any sewer or sewers, or works or other facilities for the handling, treatment or disposal of sewage, may contract with the Federal Government of the United States or any branch thereof, or with any county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation or with any person, firm or corporation for the use of any such sewer or sewers, works or facilities by any such county, city and county, municipal corporation, district or other public corporation, or for the flowage, treatment or disposal of sewage or industrial waste from any area designated by such person, firm or corporation so contracting, upon such terms and conditions as may be provided in said contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 842.)
-------------------------------------------

5830.

The board of supervisors shall thereafter, in each year, prior to the time of fixing the county tax rate, estimate the cost of maintaining and operating the improvements to be maintained and operated within the maintenance district during the ensuing year. The board of supervisors shall decide whether or not the cost of maintaining and operating the improvement shall be borne wholly or partially by the maintenance district and shall, in addition to all other taxes, fix a special tax rate for the real property within the maintenance district, or for lighting purposes levy an assessment on each parcel of real property within the maintenance district on the basis of the estimated benefit to the parcel, sufficient to raise an amount of money to cover the expense of maintaining the improvements during the ensuing year, or such portion of the amount as the board of supervisors shall determine shall be borne by the maintenance district, and the board of supervisors shall levy a special assessment tax or, for lighting purposes, an assessment each year upon the real property in the maintenance district sufficient to pay such expense, or the portion thereof, which shall be paid by the maintenance district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5830.1.

Whenever the board of supervisors levies an assessment authorized by Section 5830 for purposes of lighting maintenance, the assessment shall be levied pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 54701) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 13.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5831.

The special assessment tax shall be levied and collected at the same time and in the same manner as the general tax levy for county purposes and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the fund of the maintenance district and be used for the payment of the expenses of the district. The board of supervisors may control and order the expenditure thereof for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 15.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.

The board of supervisors may determine that the whole or any part of the expense of such maintenance shall be paid by the county. If the county is to contribute toward the expenses of such maintenance the resolution of intention shall so provide. When such provision is made the execution of the contract for maintenance shall create an obligation in the county to make the contribution provided for in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.5.

The board of supervisors may temporarily transfer moneys to the maintenance district fund from other funds in which such moneys are not immediately needed. The money so transferred shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board and shall be used for the purposes provided in this chapter and be retransferred from the maintenance district fund out of the first available receipts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.6.

If a maintenance district is organized in any year too late for the levy of a special assessment tax or an assessment, as the case may be, in that year or in the next ensuing year, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to transfer funds of the county not immediately needed for county purposes to the maintenance district fund of the district to be used for the payment of the expenses of the district until such time as special assessment tax or assessment, as the case may be, receipts are available therefor. The board of supervisors shall include in the levy of special assessment taxes or assessments for the district for the first fiscal year in which a tax or an assessment may be levied, a sum sufficient to repay to the county the amounts so transferred to the district for the portion or portions of the preceding fiscal year or years for which no levy of taxes or assessments was made for that purpose and the amounts so transferred shall be retransferred to the county treasury from the maintenance district fund of the district out of the first available receipts from the tax or assessment levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.7.

Any area of a maintenance district, or of a temporary zone formed pursuant to Section 5855 in a district, which is included in a city by annexation or incorporation after a loan has been made shall continue to be taxed or assessed for the repayment of its proportionate share of the unpaid balance of the loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5832.8.

(a) The board of supervisors may adopt an ordinance proposing the imposition of a special tax for the purpose of maintaining improvements. Such ordinance shall be submitted to the voters of the maintenance district and shall take effect upon approval of two-thirds of the voters of the district voting on the ordinance. The approval of the voters may be secured at a district or countywide election, or by a ballot mailed to each registered voter in the district. The election shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of the Elections Code. 

(b) The ordinance submitted to the voters for approval pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a) shall specify the terms of the special tax to be imposed which shall include the manner in which the obligation of each taxpayer is determined, when the special tax is to be levied, and the method of collection. The ordinance may also specify that the special tax imposed by the ordinance may be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the total appropriations subject to limitation of the local government for purposes of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.

(c) Upon approval of the voters under subdivision (a), the board may levy the special tax as authorized by the ordinance, until superseded by a new ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a), or until repealed pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the board.

(d) The provisions of this section shall apply only to maintenance districts located wholly within the Town of Portola Valley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 126, Sec. 1.   Effective May 23, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

5833.

The board of supervisors of the county in which a maintenance district is formed shall:

(a) Make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the administration, operation and government of such district.

(b) Execute all contracts and make all necessary provisions for the maintenance and operation of the district, except that the board of supervisors may authorize a designated county officer to make, execute and administer contracts for the installing, maintaining and servicing a system of lights in accordance with standards adopted by the board of supervisors and in accordance with this chapter. 

(c) Appoint and employ all necessary agents, superintendents, engineers and labor for the proper performance of the work.

(d) Perform all other acts necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the county itself from maintaining and operating any or all of the improvements when ordered by the board of supervisors and from purchasing the materials and supplies and employing the labor necessary for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.1.

“Sewers” as used in this chapter includes lateral and collecting sewers, septic tanks, and all other means of handling, gathering, and disposing of sewage in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 144.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.2.

“Maintenance of sewers” as used in this chapter includes the extension and enlargement of sewers within the district, and the acquisition or construction of other works or improvements useful in the proper operation of those sewers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.3.

“Maintenance” as used in this chapter in relation to lighting systems, includes the replacement of any obsolete equipment with new modern equipment found by the board of supervisors or legislative body of a city to be necessary for the proper operation of the district. The replacement of any such obsolete equipment with any such new modern equipment, except for work done by a utility district or a private utility company under contract with the maintenance district, shall be subject to the requirements of Article 56 (commencing with Section 20840) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.4.

The board of supervisors of any lighting maintenance district may provide for the establishment of an accumulative capital outlay fund for the replacement of obsolete lighting system equipment. The fund shall be held in reserve until appropriated in whole or in part to a specific project.

At any time after the creation of the fund, the board may transfer to it any unencumbered surplus funds remaining on hand at the end of the fiscal year after the payment of the expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------

5835.5.

Pursuant to a resolution adopted by its board of supervisors, a county may lend any available county funds to a county maintenance district for the replacement of obsolete equipment, or to defray unusual maintenance costs. Any such loan may be restricted for use in a temporary zone formed under the provisions of Section 5855 in a district. The loan shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board of supervisors, and shall be repaid in approximately equal installments over a period not to exceed 10 years. Any funds lent to the district, or zone, are appropriated for the purposes for which the loan was made. Any area of a district, or of a temporary zone in a district, which is included in a city by annexation or incorporation after a loan has been made shall continue to be taxed or assessed for the repayment of its proportionate part of the unpaid balance of the loan.

If a zone is formed to be responsible for the loan, the board of supervisors shall, in the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment may be levied in the zone, and in each succeeding year of the duration of the zone, levy a special tax or assessment upon the taxable property in the zone for the purpose of repaying with interest the amount lent to the district by the county. When the loan has been repaid, the zone shall terminate.

In case of emergency, the board of supervisors may also borrow funds from another maintenance district and the board of supervisors may lend available district funds to another maintenance district. Such loans shall be subject to the same terms and conditions as loans made from county funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

5836.

The title to all property acquired by a maintenance district shall be vested in the county. Upon the dissolution of the district by reason of all of its territory being included within a city, such property shall thereupon become the property of such city, and if all of the district is included within more than one city then such property shall be subject to the disposition of the board of supervisors of the county. Such disposition shall be between the several cities in such manner as to the board seems most just and equitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5837.

The boundaries of any maintenance district may be altered, and contiguous or noncontiguous territory whether it is within incorporated or unincorporated territory may be annexed thereto. If incorporated territory is sought to be annexed, consent thereto shall first be obtained from the legislative body of the city.

The board of supervisors may by resolution fix a time and place for hearing upon the question of annexation of such territory to an existing maintenance district. The resolution shall describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

The board of supervisors may by resolution determine that each parcel of the territory annexed or to be annexed to a sewer maintenance district should pay its proportionate share of the cost of outfall and/or pumping plant construction previously paid for by other properties within said district and shall in said resolution fix the amount to be contributed by each said parcel. No parcel so annexed or to be annexed shall be issued a permit to connect to the sewer until the full amount of contribution so fixed has been paid. Any contribution whether heretofore or hereafter collected for such purposes shall be deposited in the county treasury to the credit of said district, or shall be held in trust until the parcel is included within the boundaries of the district at which time such contributions shall be transferred to the credit of said district.

The date set for the hearing on the proposed annexation shall be at least three weeks from and after the date of the adoption of the resolution setting the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 693.)
-------------------------------------------

5838.

The board of supervisors shall cause notice of the time, place, and purpose of the hearing to be given by mail to each owner whose name and address appears on the last equalized assessment roll and who owns real property within the boundaries of the territory sought to be annexed. The notice shall contain the name and telephone number of a local department or agency designated by the board of supervisors to answer inquiries regarding the hearing proceedings. The person directed by the board of supervisors to mail the notices shall file, upon the completion of the mailing, an affidavit setting forth the time and manner of the compliance with this section.

In addition, the board of supervisors shall cause notices of the hearing to be posted in three conspicuous places within the territory proposed to be annexed. 

The notices shall be headed “Notice of hearing” in letters not less than one inch in height and shall contain a description of the territory proposed to be annexed and a statement of the time and place of the hearing. In lieu of the description the boundaries of territory proposed to be annexed may be shown by means of a diagram printed upon the notice. The notice shall be posted not less than 10 days prior to the date set for the hearing.
